Washington statutes.
RCW 15.66.055

Director's duties and responsibilities—Rules.

The director may adopt rules necessary to carry out the director's duties and responsibilities under this chapter including:

(1) The issuance, amendment, suspension, or termination of marketing orders;

(2) Procedural, technical, or administrative rules which may address and include, but are not limited to:

(a) The submission of a petition to issue, amend, or terminate a marketing order under this chapter;

(b) Nominations conducted under this chapter;

(c) Elections of commission members or referenda conducted under this chapter; and

(d) Actions of the director upon a petition to issue, amend, or terminate a marketing order;

(3) Rules that provide for a method to fund:

(a) The costs of staff support for all commodity boards and commissions in accordance with RCW 43.23.033 if the position is not directly funded by the legislature; and

(b) The actual costs related to the specific activity undertaken on behalf of an individual commodity board or commission.

[ 2002 c 313 s 44.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.